Louisiana, session 2026, SB510.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:90(A)(3)(a) and 286(A)(3)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§90. Acts prohibited on licensed premises; suspension or revocation of permits
A. No person holding a retail dealer's permit, and no person permitted to sell
alcoholic beverages at retail to consumers, and no agent, associate, employee,
representative, or servant of any such person shall do or permit any of the following
acts to be done on or about the licensed premises:
* * *
(3)(a) Intentionally entice, aid, or permit any person under the age of eighteen
years to visit or loiter in or about any place where alcoholic beverages or beer , beer,
or consumable hemp products as defined in R.S. 3:1481 are the principal
commodities sold, handled, or given away. The provisions of this Section shall in no
way prohibit the presence of any person under the age of eighteen years on or about
a licensed premises for any function sponsored by a religious or charitable
organization with tax exempt status under Section 501(3) 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code of the United States, or by a fraternal beneficiary society with tax
exempt status under 501(8) 501(c)(8) of the said code, and no alcoholic beverages
are sold, handled, given away, or accessible during the presence of any such person.
* * *
§286. Acts prohibited on licensed premises; suspension or revocation of permits
A. No person holding a retail dealer's permit, and no person permitted to sell
alcoholic beverages at retail to consumers, and no servant, agent, or employee of the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 510 ENROLLED
permittee shall do any of the following acts upon the licensed premises:
* * *
(3)(a) Intentionally entice, aid, or permit any person under the age of eighteen
years to visit or loiter in or about any place where alcoholic beverages or beer , beer,
or consumable hemp products as defined in R.S. 3:1481 are the principal
commodities sold, handled, or given away. However, the provisions of this Section
shall in no way prohibit the presence of any person under the age of eighteen years
on or about a licensed premises for any function sponsored by a religious or
charitable organization with tax exempt status under Section 501(3) 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of the United States, or by a fraternal beneficiary society with
tax exempt status under 501(8) 501(c)(8) of the said code, and no alcoholic
beverages are sold, handled, given away, or accessible during the presence of any
such person.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.